Utah statutes.
67-19-13.   Examination of payrolls and certification of employee eligibility by the executive director.

(1)  The executive director may examine payrolls at any time to determine conformity with this chapter and the regulations.

(2)  No new employee shall be hired in a position covered by this chapter, and no employee shall be changed in pay, title or status, nor shall any employee be paid unless certified by the executive director as eligible under the provisions of or regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 139, 2006 General Session

